Missouri, session 2026, HB3077.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 170, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 170.043, to read as follows:
170.043. 1. Each school district shall develop instructional materials for grades
three through twelve containing at least one unit of instruction studying the responsible
use of social media. Such instructional material shall be submitted to the local school
board. The instructional material developed shall be taught beginning in the 2027-28
school year and on a yearly basis.
2. The instructional material developed by each school district under subsection
1 of this section shall provide students with the following information:
(1) The permanency and risks of sharing material online;
(2) How to maintain personal security and identify cyberbullying, predatory
behavior, and human trafficking on the internet and social media; and
(3) How to report criminal suspicious activity or explicit content encountered on
the internet and social media to appropriate persons and authorities.
3. In addition to the required instructional material provided under subsection 2
of this section, a school district may incorporate in such instructional material
information regarding the benefits of social media use, which may include career
readiness support for future academic or employment opportunities, the sharing of
information with familiar family and friends, and safely connecting to the internet.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3077 2
4. In lieu of a school district developing its own instructional material under
subsection 1 of this section, a school district may satisfy the requirements of this section
through the adoption or implementation of instructional materials or resources
developed by a third-party organization approved or recognized by the local school
board.
5. Each school district shall provide resources to school district staff and families
of students enrolled in the school district regarding technology use, including the
following:
(1) Help with leveraging parental controls on technology devices;
(2) Time restrictions on the use of technology devices; and
(3) Information regarding the negative impacts that prolonged screen time and
access to the internet may have on a person's well-being.
6. Local school boards shall annually assess the instructional material developed
under this section.
7. This section shall expire on August 28, 2028.
✔